Connecticut, session 2026, HB05475.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall assess and
report on potential methods to facilitate the permitting process of
general permits, including (1) the use of artificial intelligence tools to do
the preliminary review of all applications, and (2) the feasibility of
creating an expedited review process with increased fees for the
expedited service for certain permits and identifying any permits
appropriate for such service and any statutory changes required to
effectuate such expedited review process.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall assess and report on methods to
facilitate the permitting process of individual permits, including, but not
limited to, (1) permits for solid waste, thermal loop and fuel cell power
generation and coastal land management, whether there are increased
automation tools that businesses and municipalities could use to reform
the timeline and costs of permitting, and (2) the feasibility of creating an
expedited review process with increased fees for the expedited service
for certain permits and identifying any permits appropriate for such
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5475
service and any statutory changes required to effectuate such expedited
review process.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall assess and report on the feasibility of
automating and reducing fees for the renewal of permits where the
applicant does not have any changes to the information given for the
original permit or the factors concerning permit renewal.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the environment and government oversight. Such report
shall include the results of the commissioner's assessments pursuant to
subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of this section and any recommendations
for legislation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b)(1),"permits" and "power generation" were moved for
clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. C/R ENV
LCO 2 of 2